District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-777

Rules and regulations for Smallpox Hospital.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1896, 29 Stat. 281, ch. 373
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(k), 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-107.
1973 Ed., § 32-306.